Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.561, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin First degree; political organization. new text end new text begin Whoever unlawfully by means of fire or explosives intentionally destroys or damages any building, whether the property of the actor or another, commits arson in the first degree and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 25 years or to a fine of not more than $40,000, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the building housed a political organization; new text end new text begin (2) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part because of an actual or perceived association between the building, building's owner, or building's occupant and any political organization; or new text end new text begin (3) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part to make any political statement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.563, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Political motivation. new text end new text begin Whoever violates subdivision 1 may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 90 months or to payment of a fine of $12,500, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the real or personal property is owned or controlled by a political organization; new text end new text begin (2) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part because of an actual or perceived association between the real or personal property and any political organization; or new text end new text begin (3) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part to make any political statement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.5631, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Political motivation. new text end new text begin Whoever violates subdivision 2 may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than one year or to payment of a fine of $5,000, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the personal property is owned or controlled by a political organization; new text end new text begin (2) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part because of an actual or perceived association between the personal property and any political organization; or new text end new text begin (3) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part to make any political statement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.5632, is amended to read: 609.5632 ARSON IN THE FIFTH DEGREE. new text begin (a) new text end Whoever intentionally by means of fire or explosives sets fire to or burns or causes to be burned any real or personal property of value is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 90 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $1,000, or both. new text begin (b) Whoever violates paragraph (a) may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of $3,000, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the real or personal property is owned or controlled by a political organization; new text end new text begin (2) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part because of an actual or perceived association between the real or personal property and any political organization; or new text end new text begin (3) the offense was committed in whole or in substantial part to make any political statement. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end